Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 176.2 of Title 60, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any trust for the benefit of the state or a county or


municipality within this state, shall be required to receive the


consent of the majority of the registered voters of the state or


such county or municipality voting at an election before each


issuance of debt.


B. The requirements of subsection A of this section shall apply


to trusts authorized to issue debt pursuant to Articles X and XI of


the Oklahoma Constitution.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2474 QD 1/15/2026 1:37:22 PM

Req. No. 2474 Page 1